test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tyo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - työ - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'arbeid' - ei tsekattu
     työ+N+Sg+Nom: työ
     työ+N+Sg+Gen: työn
     työ+N+Sg+Par: työtä
     työ+N+Sg+Tra: työksi
     työ+N+Sg+Abe: työttä
     työ+N+Sg+Ine: työssä
     työ+N+Sg+Ela: työstä
     työ+N+Sg+Ill: työhöön
     työ+N+Sg+Ade: työlä
     työ+N+Sg+Abl: työltä
     työ+N+Sg+All: työle
     työ+N+Sg+Ess: työnä
     työ+N+Pl+Nom: työt
     työ+N+Pl+Gen: työitten
     työ+N+Pl+Par: työitä
     työ+N+Pl+Tra: työiksi
     työ+N+Pl+Abe: työittä
     työ+N+Pl+Ine: työissä
     työ+N+Pl+Ela: työistä
     työ+N+Pl+Ill: työihiin
     työ+N+Pl+Ade: työilä
     työ+N+Pl+Abl: työiltä
     työ+N+Pl+All: työile
     työ+N+Pl+Ess: työinä
     työ+N+Pl+Com: työine
